Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-112
Returns; record.

The county clerk of each county in the state shall record all such returns of such marriages in a book to be kept for that purpose within one month after receiving the returns.

R.S.1866, c. 34, § 12, p. 255;

R.S.1913, § 1551;

C.S.1922, § 1500;

C.S.1929, § 42-112;

R.S.1943, § 42-112;

Laws 1986, LB 525, § 9.

Department of Health and Human Services, marriage records, duties, see section 71-616.